District of Columbia statutes.
29A-301.90

Repealed

Proclaimed corporation — Reinstatement; corporate name.

Repealed.

Aug. 6, 1962, 76 Stat. 300, Pub. L. 87-569, § 90
Sept. 8, 1995, D.C. Law 11-42, § 2(f), 42 DCR 3285
July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 3(l), 58 DCR 1720
For temporary (90 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of Reinstated Nonprofit Corporation Contract Ratification Emergency Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Act 18-196, October 10, 2009, 56 DCR 8128).
For temporary suspension of the 5-year reporting provision, see § 3(b) of the Business and Nonprofit Corporation Five-Year Annual Report Suspension Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-307, August 1, 1996, 43 DCR 4208).
For temporary suspension in section of references to 5-year reporting, filing, or payment of fees requirements until after December 31, 1996, at which time the 1-year or annual requirements shall be in effect and the annual report fee shall be $25, see § 3(b) of the Business and Nonprofit Corporation Five-Year Report Suspension Emergency Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Act 11-247, April 11, 1996, 43 DCR 2125).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of the Reinstated Nonprofit Corporation Contract Ratification Temporary Amendment Act of 2009 (D.C. Law 18-90, December 17, 2009, law notification 57 DCR 1162).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 3(b) of the Business and Nonprofit Corporation Five-Year Annual Report Suspension Temporary Amendment Act of 1996 (D.C. Law 11-150, July 20, 1996, law notification 44 DCR 2863).
1973 Ed., § 29-1090.
1981 Ed., § 29-591.
2001 Ed., § 29-301.90.